Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201855-452
Attempt to commit an offense.

(1) An act done with specific intent to commit an offense under the code, amounting to more than mere preparation and tending, even though failing, to effect its commission is an attempt to commit that offense.

(2) Any person subject to the code who attempts to commit any offense punishable by the code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, unless otherwise specifically prescribed.

(3) Any person subject to the code may be convicted of an attempt to commit an offense although it appears on the trial that the offense was consummated.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 52, p. 1574;

Laws 2016, LB754, § 15.